District of Columbia statutes.
2-1704

Reporting requirements.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, each agency shall transmit to the Library of Governmental Information at least 2 copies of each report, study, or publication prepared by the agency or independent contractor immediately after they have been issued. At least one copy of each report, study, or publication shall be made available to the public at the Library of Governmental Information.

(b)

The Mayor shall make available to the public an electronic version of the list, by category, of the documents transmitted under subsection (a) of this section through the Internet, no later than 30 days from the date of the transmission from the agency.

(c)

The provisions of subsection (a) and (b) of this section shall not apply to drafts or unofficial copies of accounting, auditing, or financial reports, studies, or publications.

Sept. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-19, § 5, 32 DCR 3590
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-235, § 2(d), 38 DCR 302
Oct. 17, 2002, D.C. Law 14-195, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7638
1981 Ed., § 1-2904.
D.C. Law 14-195 rewrote the section which had read as follows:
“(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the head of each agency shall transmit to the Library of Governmental Information at least 2 copies of each report, study, or publication of the agency and those prepared by independent contractors, immediately after they have been issued. At least 1 copy of each report, study, or publication of the District or agency shall be available at the Library of Governmental Information at all times.
“(b) The provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to drafts or unofficial copies of accounting, auditing, or financial reports, studies, or publications.”
Section 3 of D.C. Law 14-195 provided that this act shall apply as of October 1, 2002.